Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201576-2207.10
Credential holder, defined.

Credential holder means (1) any person who holds a valid credential (a) as a real property associate or (b) as a trainee real property appraiser, licensed real property appraiser, certified residential real property appraiser, or certified general real property appraiser and (2) any person who holds a temporary permit to engage in real property appraisal activity within this state.

Laws 2015, LB139, § 18.